Washington statutes.
RCW 36.24.200

Subpoena for production—Authority.

In addition to any of its existing authorities, the coroner may, in the course of an active or ongoing death investigation, request that the superior court issue subpoenas for production of documents or other records and command each person to whom the subpoena is directed to produce and permit inspection and copying of documentary evidence or tangible things in the possession, custody, or control of that person at a specified time and place. A subpoena for production must substantively comply with the requirements of CR 45. A subpoena for production may be joined with a subpoena for testimony, or it may be issued separately.

[ 2019 c 237 s 1.]